Maine, session 132, LD1914.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §4364, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10. Application. For a sole source aquifer municipality, the applicability of this
section is governed by section 4364-D. For the purposes of this subsection, "sole source
aquifer municipality" has the same meaning as in section 4364-D, subsection 1, paragraph
C.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §4364-A, sub-§11 is enacted to read:
11. Application. For a sole source aquifer municipality, the applicability of this
section is governed by section 4364-D. For the purposes of this subsection, "sole source
aquifer municipality" has the same meaning as in section 4364-D, subsection 1, paragraph
C.
Sec. 3. 30-A MRSA §4364-B, sub-§14 is enacted to read:
14. Application. For a sole source aquifer municipality, the applicability of this
section is governed by section 4364-D. For the purposes of this subsection, "sole source
aquifer municipality" has the same meaning as in section 4364-D, subsection 1, paragraph
C.
Sec. 4. 30-A MRSA §4364-C, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Application. For a sole source aquifer municipality, the applicability of this section
is governed by section 4364-D. For the purposes of this subsection, "sole source aquifer
municipality" has the same meaning as in section 4364-D, subsection 1, paragraph C.
Sec. 5. 30-A MRSA §4364-D is enacted to read:
§4364-D. Housing density exemption for certain island and peninsular municipalities
1. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise indicates,
the following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Hydrogeology" means the science of the occurrence, distribution and movement
of groundwater.
B. "Sole source aquifer" means an aquifer designated by the United States
Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to 42 United States Code, Section
300h-3(e) as the sole or principal drinking water source for an area that if contaminated
would create a significant hazard to public health.
C. "Sole source aquifer municipality" means a municipality that is located wholly or
partially on an island or peninsula and relies on a primary drinking water supply
derived from a sole source aquifer.
2. Exemption from increased housing density requirements pending geological
evaluation. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in sections 4364 to 4364-C, a
sole source aquifer municipality is not required to allow increased housing density in an
area within the municipality unless a licensed geologist determines that the groundwater
and septic capacity of the municipality can support an increase in housing density. A sole
source aquifer municipality shall pursue the geological evaluation described in subsection
3 consistent with the time frames established in rules adopted by the Department of
Economic and Community Development pursuant to subsection 7.
Page 1 - 132LR2013(01)

3. Evaluation of groundwater and septic capacity. A sole source aquifer
municipality shall contract with a qualified geologist who is licensed in this State and has
expertise and experience in the field of hydrogeology to determine whether the
groundwater and septic capacity within the municipality or a particular area within the
municipality can support an increase in housing density. The evaluation process must
include an analysis of the following:
A. The specific soils and geology of the area being considered for an increase in
housing density;
B. The capacity of existing groundwater resources to support additional density
without adversely impacting drinking water supplies;
C. The ability of septic systems to function safely and effectively, accounting for
existing and planned future development; and
D. The proximity to salt water and potential impacts on groundwater and septic system
performance.
After completing the analysis as required pursuant to this subsection, the geologist
performing the evaluation shall complete a report that includes the geologist's
recommendations and findings, including whether the evidence shows that the groundwater
and septic capacity in the area evaluated can support an increase in housing density.
4. Municipal action following evaluation report. This subsection governs the effect
of the evaluation report under subsection 3 on the obligations of the sole source aquifer
municipality with respect to the requirements of sections 4364 to 4364-C.
A. If the evaluation report demonstrates that the municipality or a particular area within
the municipality can support increased housing density, the sole source aquifer
municipality shall develop or amend its comprehensive plan and zoning ordinances to
allow increased density as required under sections 4364 to 4364-C, but only to the
extent the area can support the increase consistent with the findings of the evaluation
report.
B. If the evaluation report demonstrates that the municipality or a particular area within
the municipality cannot support increased housing density, the municipality remains
exempt from the requirements of sections 4364 to 4364-C for the area determined to
be unable to support increased density.
5. Implementation date. Notwithstanding sections 4364 to 4364-C, for a sole source
aquifer municipality required to comply with sections 4364 to 4364-C as provided in
subsection 4, paragraph A, wherever the term "implementation date" appears in sections
4364 to 4364-C, the applicable date is the date the evaluation report completed pursuant to
subsection 3 is received by the municipality.
6. Reporting requirements. A sole source aquifer municipality shall submit an
annual report to the Department of Economic and Community Development detailing the
municipality's progress toward completing the evaluation required under this section and
any actions taken by the municipality to address housing density.
7. Rule-making authority. The Department of Environmental Protection and the
Department of Economic and Community Development shall adopt rules pursuant to this
subsection as follows.
Page 2 - 132LR2013(01)

A. The Department of Economic and Community Development shall adopt rules to
implement this section, including but not limited to:
(1) Rules establishing a time frame in which sole source aquifer municipalities
must obtain an evaluation pursuant to subsection 3; and
(2) Other rules establishing guidance for municipal compliance with this section.
B. The Department of Environmental Protection shall adopt rules limited to:
(1) Rules establishing criteria by which sole source aquifer municipalities may
select a licensed geologist to perform the evaluation required under subsection 3;
and
(2) Other rules as necessary to facilitate the performance of the evaluation pursuant
to subsection 3.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.